Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 1. Compensation to Victims of Crime

§ 5351.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Board” means the Victims Compensation Board established under this chapter.

“Dependent” means the victim’s spouse or a person who is legally dependent for support upon a victim.

“Crime” includes delinquent acts and an act of terrorism, as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2331, committed outside the United States against a resident of this State.

“Injury” means actual bodily harm or pregnancy, or emotional harm resulting from the crime.

“Pecuniary loss” means, in the case of a victim, the amount of medical or medically related expenses, loss of wages, and any other expenses that the Board feels became necessary as a direct result of the crime. Medical or medically related expenses may include, but are not limited to, the costs of individual or family psychological, psychiatric, or mental health counseling and the costs of replacing or repairing eyeglasses, hearing aids, dentures, or any prosthetic devices that were taken, lost, or destroyed during the commission of the crime. In the case of a dependent, “pecuniary loss” means the cost of psychological, psychiatric, or mental health counseling, funeral expenses for the victim, and, upon demonstration of financial hardship, temporary living expenses.

“Unreimbursed pecuniary loss” means a pecuniary loss:

that is not covered by medical, hospitalization, or disability insurance or workers’ compensation; and

that has not been ordered by the court to be restored to the victim or dependent by the person who caused the loss; or

that has been ordered by the court to be restored to the victim or dependent but has not been paid by the person who caused the loss.

“Victim” means:

a person who sustains injury or death as a direct result of the commission or attempted commission of a crime; or

an intervenor who is injured or killed in an attempt to assist the person described in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (7) or the police; or

a surviving immediate family member of a homicide victim, including a spouse, domestic partner, parent, sibling, child, grandparent, or other survivor who may suffer severe emotional harm as a result of the victim’s death as determined on a case-by-case basis in the discretion of the Board; or

a resident of this State who is injured or killed as the result of a crime committed outside the United States.

“Profits from crimes” means:

any property obtained through or income generated from the commission of a crime in which the defendant was convicted;

any property obtained by or income generated from the sale, conversion, or exchange of proceeds of a crime, including any gain realized by such sale, conversion, or exchange;

any property that the defendant obtained or any income generated as a result of having committed the crime, including any assets obtained through the use of unique knowledge acquired during the commission of or in preparation for the commission of the crime, as well as any property obtained or income generated from the sale, conversion, or exchange of such property and any gain realized by such sale, conversion, or exchange; and

any property defendant obtained or any income generated from the sale of tangible property the value of which is increased by the notoriety gained from the conviction of an offense by the person accused or convicted of the crime.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 214 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended 1991, No. 107, § 2; 1995, No. 22, § 1; 1997, No. 61, §§ 56a, 56b; 2003, No. 92 (Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 13, 2004; 2007, No. 173 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; 2009, No. 55, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009.

§ 5352.
Victims Compensation Board.

The Victims Compensation Board is established for the purpose of awarding compensation to victims of crimes and to their dependents. The Board shall consist of five members appointed by the Governor as follows: one physician licensed to practice in this State, one attorney admitted to practice in this State, one individual who is a crime victim, and two public members. Each member shall serve for a term of three years. A vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The Board shall function independently. In order to maximize eligibility for federal reimbursement, the Center for Crime Victim Services shall coordinate the Victims Compensation Program with other programs compensating victims of crime, including offender restitution and counseling costs for victims of child sexual abuse.

The Board shall meet at least monthly to review and determine applications. Members of the Board are entitled to compensation and expenses as provided under 32 V.S.A. § 1010.

The Board shall adopt rules under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including rules relating to evaluation and determination of awards under this chapter.

The Board may employ such staff as needed to carry out the provisions of this chapter. Staff retained by the Board shall not be considered State employees.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 214 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended 1991, No. 263 (Adj. Sess.), § 3; 2015, No. 97 (Adj. Sess.), § 77.

§ 5353.
Application for compensation.

A victim or a dependent of a victim shall, upon application, be eligible for compensation if:

a law enforcement official has filed a report concluding that a crime was committed which resulted in the injury or death of the victim; and

the crime was committed in this State; or

the victim is a Vermont resident, the state in which the crime occurred does not have an eligible crime Victims Compensation Program and the applicant would have been eligible for compensation under this chapter if the crime had been committed in this State; or

the victim is a Vermont resident who is injured or killed by an act of terrorism outside the United States, to the extent that compensation is not otherwise available under federal law.

Victims of crimes subject to federal jurisdiction, and their dependents, shall be eligible for compensation on the same basis as victims of State crimes.

The application for compensation shall be signed by the applicant and shall contain at least the following information which shall be provided subject to the penalties of perjury:

A description of the date, nature, and circumstances of the crime.

A complete financial statement, including pecuniary losses and the extent to which the applicant has been or may be indemnified for these expenses from any source.

When appropriate, a statement indicating the extent of any disability resulting from the injury.

When reasonably available, copies of all law enforcement reports and reports from all health care providers who treated or examined the victim at the time of or after the crime or who treated or examined the dependent.

The applicant’s Social Security number for the purpose of making cash payment to the applicant in accordance with section 5356 of this title.

In any case in which the person entitled to compensation under this chapter is a minor or is mentally incompetent or unable to apply because of his or her physical condition, the application may be made on the person’s behalf by a parent, spouse, guardian, or other person authorized to administer the estate.

In any case in which a victim otherwise eligible for compensation under this chapter dies without making an application, the Board may, upon application, award medical or medically related expenses to the victim’s estate.

The Board may award funeral expenses to the next of kin of a deceased victim who is not survived by a dependent.

A victim or a dependent of a victim shall be eligible for compensation for pecuniary losses sustained as a result of a crime that occurred after July 1, 1987 if the losses occurred on or after July 1, 1990.

A victim who is under the age of 18 at the time the application for compensation is filed shall be eligible for compensation for pecuniary losses sustained as a result of a crime, no matter when the crime occurred, if the losses occurred on or after July 1, 1990.

A victim shall be eligible for compensation for pecuniary losses sustained as a result of a crime which occurred before July 1, 1987 if at the time of application the case is being investigated or is being prosecuted.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 214 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended 1991, No. 107, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1997, No. 147 (Adj. Sess.), § 53; 2005, No. 162 (Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2007; 2007, No. 173 (Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 5354.
Review of applications.

The Board shall review applications to determine whether compensation should be awarded under this chapter.

If, in the opinion of the Board, a report by an impartial medical expert relating to the applicant’s health care history, the applicant’s condition after the injury or the cause of the victim’s death would be of material assistance, the Board may order such an examination and report, at the Board’s expense.

In making its determination, the board shall consider all relevant information presented to the Board.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 214 (Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 5355.
Approval or rejection of application.

After review of the evidence relevant to the application for compensation, the Board shall approve the application if a preponderance of the evidence shows that as a direct result of the crime an injury occurred that resulted in a pecuniary loss to the victim or the dependent.

An application for assistance shall be denied if any of the following apply:

The application was not made within the period of time permitted for commencing prosecution of the crime. The Board may extend the time for filing for good cause shown.

The victim violated a criminal law of this State that caused or contributed to the victim’s injuries or death.

If the Board intends to deny an application, the Board shall send the applicant written notice of the decision personally or by certified mail. The notice shall include a statement of the reasons for the action and shall advise the applicant that the applicant may file a petition with the Board for review of its preliminary decision within 30 days of the date on which the notice is mailed. After the hearing, the Board shall affirm or reverse the preliminary denial, explaining the reasons therefor in writing.

The decision of the Board shall be final.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 214 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended 1991, No. 107, § 4.

§ 5356.
Amount of compensation.

If the application is approved, the Board shall authorize cash payments, not to exceed $10,000.00, to or on behalf of the applicant, equal to the unreimbursed pecuniary loss directly resulting from the injury or death of the victim. Applications approved in any fiscal year shall not exceed funds appropriated and authorized in that fiscal year for this purpose.

Funds available to the Board for payments include fees collected and deposited by the court into the Victims Compensation Fund as described in section 7282 of this title and monies from inmate labor contributions from the prison industries enhancement program or from any other source.

The Board may reimburse health care facilities and health care providers as defined in 18 V.S.A. § 9402 at 60 percent of the billed charges for compensation claims for uninsured crime victims who do not qualify for the hospital’s patient assistance program, Medicaid, or Medicare. The health care facility or health care provider shall not bill any balance to the uninsured crime victim.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 214 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended 1995, No. 63, § 53; 2007, No. 173 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; 2015, No. 34, § 2, eff. May 26, 2015.

§ 5357.
Subrogation; lien; disposition of proceeds.

The State shall be subrogated to the rights of the victim, assignee, heir, or dependent to whom cash payments are granted to the extent of the cash payments granted, less the amount of any fine imposed by the court on the perpetrator of the crime. The State shall have a lien therefor and may commence an action or intervene in any action to protect and enforce the lien. Such subrogation rights shall be against any person liable for the pecuniary loss.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 214 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended 2017, No. 107 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 19, 2018.

§ 5358.
Duties of law enforcement agency.

Every law enforcement agency shall inform victims of crimes and their dependents of the provisions of this chapter and provide application forms to persons who desire to seek compensation.
The Board shall provide application forms and other information which local law enforcement agencies may require to comply with this section.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 214 (Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 5358a.
Application information; confidentiality.

All documents reviewed by the Victims Compensation Board for purposes of approving an application for compensation shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed without the consent of the victim except as provided in this section and subsection 7043(c) of this title.

For the purpose of requesting restitution, the amount of assistance provided by the Victims Compensation Board shall be established by copies of bills submitted to the Victims Compensation Board reflecting the amount paid by the Board and stating that the services for which payment was made were for uninsured pecuniary losses.

The following shall be confidential and shall be redacted by the Victims Compensation Board for any purpose including restitution: the victim’s residential address, telephone number, and other contact information and the victim’s Social Security number. In cases involving stalking, sexual offenses, and domestic violence, the following information shall also be confidential and shall not be disclosed by the Victims Compensation Board for any purpose, including restitution, absent a court order:

the victim’s employer’s name, telephone number, address, or any other contact information; and

the victim’s medical or mental health provider’s name, telephone number, address, or any other contact information.

Meetings of the Victims Compensation Board relating to victims compensation or offender restitution shall not be subject to the Vermont Open Meeting Law, 1 V.S.A. chapter 5, subchapter 2. Annually, the Board shall hold an open meeting to present information and data concerning the victims compensation and offender restitution programs, including aggregate information on cases, pecuniary loss, expense reimbursement, restitution orders, profits from crimes, and nonidentifying information on the amounts of compensation awarded to victims.

HISTORY:

Added 2011, No. 145 (Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. May 15, 2012; amended 2019, No. 127 (Adj. Sess.), § 1.